Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 349 Coalbed Methane Development
349.160.
Construction and interpretation of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude any coal interest holder from removing support of the surface and any structure or facilities thereon and other strata as such rights may exist in any severance deed or other contract.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to or shall be construed as superseding, impairing, abridging, or affecting any specific contractual rights or obligations now or hereafter existing between the respective owners of coal, oil, gas, or other minerals, or any interests therein.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to, or be used or interpreted to, determine ownership.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to, or be used or interpreted to, apply to any well otherwise permitted, approved, or regulated under KRS Chapter 353 except for the wells that are to be converted to or operated as coalbed methane wells.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any limitation of production of coalbed methane from any coalbed methane well, lease, drilling unit, pool, field, or property to prevent or control economic waste or to limit production to market demand.

This chapter shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the declaration of public policy set forth in KRS

349.005

.

Coalbed methane wells shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 353, except as expressly provided in this chapter.

Gathering lines associated with coalbed methane wells shall be regulated under KRS 353.500(2) and the regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 32, effective July 13, 2004.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Thomas, Coalbed Methane: Who Owns This $4.8 Billion Natural Resource in Kentucky. Vol. 72, No. 2, March 2008, Ky. Bench & Bar 6..